Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.727

Small businesses—Effects of technical assistance—Reports—Web-based information system.

(1) By November 15, 2013, and November 15th every two years thereafter, the department, the department of transportation, and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature providing verifiable information regarding the effects the technical assistance under RCW 43.19.725(3) is having on the number of small businesses annually receiving state contracts for goods and services purchased by the state.

(2) By December 31, 2013, the department, the department of transportation, and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 must use the web-based information system created under subsection (3)(a) of this section to capture the data required under subsection (3)(a) of this section.

(3)(a) The department, in consultation with the department of transportation and the department of commerce, must develop and implement a web-based information system. The web-based information system must be used to capture data, track outcomes, and provide accurate and verifiable information regarding the effects the technical assistance under RCW 43.19.725(3) is having on the number of small businesses annually receiving state contracts for goods and services purchased by the state. Such measurable data shall include, but not be limited to: (i) The number of registered small businesses that have been awarded state procurement contracts, (ii) the percentage of total state dollars spent for goods and services purchased from registered small businesses, and (iii) the number of registered small businesses that have bid on but were not awarded state purchasing contracts.

(b) By September 1, 2012, the department, in collaboration with the department of transportation, shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature providing any recommendations for needed legislation to improve the collection of data required under (a) of this subsection.

(c) By December 31, 2013, the department must make the web-based information system available to all state purchasing agencies.

(d) The department may also make the web-based information system available to other agencies that would like to use the system for the purposes of chapter 358, Laws of 2011.

[ 2012 c 224 s 27; 2011 c 358 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 224: See RCW 39.26.900.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 358: See note following RCW 43.19.725.